Utah statutes.
11-27-1.   Short title -- Recital of authority required on face of bonds.
This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the "Utah Refunding Bond Act."
All bonds issued under the authority provided for in this chapter shall
contain on their face a recital to that effect.
